Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB467.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall serve as the central procurement and
contracting agency of the Commonwealth. The cabinet shall:
(a) [The cabinet shall ]Require all agencies to furnish an estimate of specific
needs for supplies, materials, and equipment to be purchased by competitive
bidding for the purpose of permitting scheduling of purchasing in large
volume. The cabinet shall establish and enforce schedules for purchasing
supplies, materials, and equipment. In addition, prior to the beginning of each
fiscal year all agencies shall submit to the Finance and Administration
Cabinet an estimate of all needs for supplies, materials, and equipment during
that year which will have to be required through competitive bidding;[.]
(b) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall ]Have the authority[power],
with the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
to transfer between departments, to salvage, to exchange, and to condemn
supplies, equipment, and real property; and[.]
(c) [The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall ]Attempt in every practicable
way to ensure that state agencies are fulfilling their business needs through the
application of the best value criteria.
(2) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall recommend regulations, rules, and
procedures and shall have supervision over all purchases by the various spending
agencies, except as otherwise provided by law, and, subject to the approval of the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, shall promulgate
administrative regulations to govern purchasing by or for all these agencies. The
cabinet shall publish a manual of procedures which shall be incorporated by
reference as an administrative regulation in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS
Page 1 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
Chapter 13A. This manual shall be distributed to agencies and shall be revised upon
issuance of amendments to these procedures. No purchase or contract shall be
binding on the state or any agency thereof unless approved by the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or made under general administrative regulations
promulgated by the cabinet.
(3) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase or otherwise acquire, or,
with the approval of the secretary, may delegate and control the purchase and
acquisition of the combined requirements of all spending agencies of the state,
including, but not limited to, interests in real property, contractual services, rentals
of all types, supplies, materials, equipment, and services.
(4) (a) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose
of any interest in real property of the state which is not needed, or has become
unsuitable for public use, or would be more suitable to the public's interest if
used in another manner, as determined by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
(b) The determination of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall be set forth in an order and shall be reached only after review of a
written request by the agency desiring to dispose of the real property. This
request shall describe the real property and state the reasons why the agency
believes the real property should be disposed.
(c) Before the disposal of real property, the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall determine that:
1. No other state agency has a purpose for the real property; and
2. The city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated local
government where the real property is located does not have an
ownership interest in the real property.
(d) All instruments required by law to be recorded which convey any interest in
Page 2 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
any real property so disposed of shall be executed and signed by the secretary
of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and approved by the Governor.
(e) Unless the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet deems it in
the best interest of the state to proceed otherwise, all interests in real property
shall be sold either by invitation of sealed bids or by public auction. The
selling price of any interest in real property shall not be less than the appraised
value thereof as determined by the cabinet, or the Transportation Cabinet for
the requirements of that cabinet.
(f) A state agency notifying the Finance and Administration Cabinet of its
intent to dispose of any interest in real property assigned to the state agency
shall continue to provide maintenance and security of the existing
structures, buildings, and land included in the real property until the sale or
other disposition is complete.
(g) In the event the Finance and Administration Cabinet receives no responsive
bids for real property being disposed of, either by sealed bid or by public
auction, the real property may be disposed of, consistent with the public
interest, in any manner deemed appropriate by the secretary of the Finance
and Administration Cabinet. A written description of the real property, the
method of disposal, and the amount of compensation, if any, shall be made
by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(5) (a) If state-owned real property is observed to be abandoned, or it has not been
substantially utilized for a public use, the chief executive officer of the city,
county, urban-county government, or consolidated local government where
the real property is located may:
1. Receive notice inquiring about the real property from a citizen,
developer, or consultant as described in paragraph (d) of this
subsection;
Page 3 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
2. Develop a plan for public use of the real property; and
3. Submit a written notice to the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet and the Capital Planning Advisory Board:
a. Expressing interest in the use of the real property;
b. Requesting state utilization information from the Finance and
Administration Cabinet on the availability of the real property
for disposal; and
c. Requesting the real property to be considered for sale, trade, or
disposal.
(b) Within sixty (60) calendar days of receiving written notice under paragraph
(a)3. of this subsection, the secretary of Finance and Administration
Cabinet shall send a written response to the chief executive officer of the
city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated local government
and the Capital Planning Advisory Board that includes but is not limited to:
1. The current occupancy and use of the real property;
2. If the Finance and Administration Cabinet or other applicable state
agency intends to evaluate real property for disposal under subsection
(4) of this section or to maintain its ownership interest in the real
property for public use; and
3. Provide a description of the real property, current status, available and
planned occupancy, utilization, restrictions of use, and a timeline for
full utilization of the property.
(c) If the applicable state agency determines to request disposal of the real
property, the state agency and Finance and Administration Cabinet shall
proceed in accordance with subsection (4) of this section.
(d) A citizen, developer, or consultant may notify the chief executive officer of
the city, county, urban-county government, or consolidated local
Page 4 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
government where state-owned real property is located if he or she observes
that the state-owned real property is abandoned or not substantially utilized
for public use.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of all
personal property of the state that is not needed, or has become unsuitable for
public use, or would be more suitable to the public's interest if used in another
manner, or, with the approval of the secretary, may delegate the sale, trade, or other
disposal of the personal property. In the event the authority is delegated, the method
for disposal shall be determined by the agency head, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
and shall be set forth in a document describing the property and stating the method
of disposal and the reasons why the agency believes the property should be
disposed of. In the event the authority is not delegated, requests to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of the property shall
describe the property and state the reasons why the agency believes the property
should be disposed of. The method for disposal shall be determined by the Division
of Surplus Properties, and approved by the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet or his or her designee.
(7)[(6)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall exercise general supervision
and control over all warehouses, storerooms, and stores and of all inventories of
supplies, services, and construction belonging to the Commonwealth. The cabinet
shall promulgate administrative regulations to require agencies to take and maintain
inventories of plant property, buildings, structures, other fixed assets, and
equipment. The cabinet shall conduct periodic physical audits of inventories.
(8)[(7)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall establish and maintain
programs for the development and use of purchasing specifications and for the
inspection, testing, and acceptance of supplies, services, and construction.
Page 5 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(9)[(8)] Nothing in this section shall prevent the Finance and Administration Cabinet
from negotiating with vendors who maintain a General Services Administration
price agreement with the United States of America or any agency thereof. No
contract executed under this provision shall authorize a price higher than is
contained in the contract between the General Services Administration and the
vendor affected.
(10)[(9)] Except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180, and subject to
the provisions of this code, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall purchase
or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state use, upon
approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the
determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other acquisition. The
amount paid for this real property shall not exceed the appraised value as
determined by the cabinet or the Transportation Cabinet (for such requirements of
that cabinet), or the value set by eminent domain procedure. Subject to the
provisions of this code, real property or any interest therein may be purchased,
leased, or otherwise acquired from any officer or employee of any agency of the
state upon a finding by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, based upon a
written application by the head of the agency requesting the purchase, and approved
by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Governor, that
the employee has not either himself or herself, or through any other person,
influenced or attempted to influence either the agency requesting the acquisition of
the property or the Finance and Administration Cabinet in connection with such
acquisition. Whenever such an acquisition is consummated, the request and finding
shall be recorded and kept by the Secretary of State along with the other documents
recorded pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 56.
(11)[(10)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain records of all
purchases and sales made under its authority and shall make periodic summary
Page 6 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
reports of all transactions to the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, the Governor, and the General Assembly. The Finance and Administration
Cabinet shall also report trends in costs and prices, including savings realized
through improved practices, to the above authorities. The Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall also compile an annual report of state purchases by all
spending agencies in the state's statewide accounting and reporting system. The
report format shall include, but not be limited to, dollar amount, volume, type of
purchase, and vendor.
(12)[(11)] For capital construction projects, subject to the provisions of this code and
KRS 45A.180, the procurement may be on whichever of the following alternative
project delivery methods, in the judgment of the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet after first considering the traditional design-bid-build
project delivery method, offers the best value to the taxpayer:
(a) A design-build basis; or
(b) A construction management-at-risk basis.
Proposals shall be reviewed by the engineering staff to assure quality and value, and
compliance with procurement procedures. All specifications shall be written to
promote competition. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the procurement of
phased bidding or construction manager-agency services.
(13)[(12)] The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have control and supervision
over all purchases of energy-consuming equipment, supplies, and related equipment
purchased or acquired by any agency of the state as provided in this code, and shall
promulgate administrative regulations to designate the manner in which an energy-
consuming item will be purchased so as to promote energy conservation and
acquisition of energy efficient products. Major energy components shall be
amortized on a seven (7) to ten (10) years' recovery basis and shall take into
consideration the projected cost of fuel. The Finance and Administration Cabinet, in
Page 7 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
consultation with the Cabinet for Economic Development, shall conduct a thorough
economic feasibility analysis on any major energy-using component of at least three
million (3,000,000) BTU's per hour heat input and shall issue a certificate of
economic feasibility prior to the Finance and Administration Cabinet's purchasing
or retrofitting any such component that utilizes any fuel other than coal. The
economic feasibility analysis shall consist of life-cycle cost comparisons of a
component that would utilize coal and one(s) that would utilize any fuel other than
coal. For the analysis, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide
detailed estimates of equipment purchase price, installation cost, annual operation
and maintenance costs, and usage patterns of energy-using components.
Section 2. KRS 56.463 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall have the power and duty:
(1) To determine the comparative needs and demands of the various state agencies for
acquiring real estate and for building projects;
(2) To purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state
use and upon the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet as to the determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other
acquisition, except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180. All such
acquisitions of real property or interests therein shall be made in accordance with
KRS 45A.045;
(3) (a) To sell or otherwise dispose of all property, including any interest in real
property, of the state that is not needed or has become unsuitable for public
use or would be more suitable consistent with the public interest for some
other use as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet. All such sales or other disposition shall be made in accordance with
KRS 45A.045.[;]
(b) A state agency notifying the Finance and Administration Cabinet of its
Page 8 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
intent to dispose of any interest in real property assigned to the state agency
shall continue to provide maintenance and security of the existing
structures, buildings, and land included in the real property until the sale or
other disposition is complete in accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(4) (a) To control the use of any real property owned or otherwise held by the
Commonwealth, or any state agency, and to determine for what periods of
time and for what purposes any state agency may use the same, including the
agency for whose use it was initially acquired or improved, and to determine
what appropriate uses shall be made of such real property during periods that
the cabinet finds the same is not required for the purposes of any particular
state agency. The cabinet shall allocate to the General Assembly and the
Legislative Research Commission all space within the New State Capitol
Annex in the basement and on the first, second, third, and fourth floors,
excluding:
1. Mechanical areas, public entrances, vestibules, and restrooms; and
2. The following additional space, as allocated on January 1, 2023:
a. Areas in the basement occupied by the Kentucky State Police and
Facilities Security;
b. Areas in the basement operated as the snack bar and cafeteria, as
well as storage areas related to the operation of the snack bar and
cafeteria;
c. The area in the basement operated as a nurse's station;
d. The area in the basement used as an automated teller machine
(ATM);
e. The office space in the basement occupied by the Secretary of
State;
f. Utility spaces in the basement west wing and east wing
Page 9 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
northernmost hallways occupied by janitorial, maintenance, and
mechanical staff;
g. The loading dock in the rear of the annex basement, along with the
office space immediately adjacent to the loading dock on the back
wall of the annex, provided that the General Assembly and the
Legislative Research Commission shall be given access to and use
of the loading dock and the receiving areas adjacent to the loading
dock; and
h. Office and studio space on the first floor currently occupied and
used for broadcasting purposes by Kentucky Educational
Television.
All space assigned to the legislative branch and plans, uses, furnishings, and
equipment therefor are subject to the specific approval of the Legislative
Research Commission;
(b) All additional space in the New State Capitol Annex, not specifically
allocated for use by the General Assembly and the Legislative Research
Commission in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall be allocated for the use
of the legislative branch, with occupancy by the legislative branch to be
determined by the Legislative Research Commission, upon a vote of a
majority of the entire membership of the Legislative Research Commission;
(c) In order for the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission
to efficiently utilize the space provided by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this
subsection, the cabinet shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with
the Legislative Research Commission on or about February 1, 2024, and as
often as every two (2) years thereafter at the request of the Legislative
Research Commission, to establish tenancy terms, including but not limited to
building maintenance, repairs, renovations, and upgrades; facility security;
Page 10 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
janitorial services; and applicable rental and utilities rates. The Legislative
Research Commission shall at any time, and upon at least sixty (60) days'
notice, be authorized to discontinue the cabinet's provision of janitorial
services for the New State Capitol Annex and to enter into a separate contract
for the provision of those services, with the applicable rental and utilities rates
to be proportionately reduced to reflect that separate contract, provided that
the Legislative Research Commission may also at any time, and upon at least
sixty (60) days' notice, elect to have the cabinet continue or reinstate the
provision of those janitorial services at the cabinet's expense;
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, real property shall include the parking
areas adjacent to the New State Capitol and the New State Capitol Annex, and
the cabinet shall allocate to the General Assembly and the Legislative
Research Commission all parking spaces within the Capitol campus parking
garage, all parking spaces in the east, south, and west parking lots of the New
State Capitol Annex, and all parking spaces in the west parking lot of the New
State Capitol, except for those spaces in the west parking lot of the New State
Capitol allocated, as of January 1, 2023, to the Supreme Court of Kentucky,
the Lieutenant Governor, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of State.
Any further allocation of any parking spaces allocated pursuant to this
paragraph shall be within the sole discretion of the Legislative Research
Commission or its designee; and
(e) To determine the housing and furnishings needs of the various state agencies
located in Frankfort and to establish and put into effect a permanent program
for housing them. Subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the
cabinet is also authorized and directed to allocate office space and furnishings
in existing public buildings located in Frankfort, exclusive of the third and
fourth floors of the New State Capitol and the space in the New State Capitol
Page 11 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
Annex allocated to the legislative branch, according to the needs of the
various agencies. When necessary, the cabinet is authorized to provide
additional office space and furnishings in Frankfort under any building
program the cabinet deems most advisable and economical for the state. The
permanent housing program shall include provisions for housing the General
Assembly and its related agencies, including the Legislative Research
Commission, and its subcommittees, the executive offices, the Supreme Court
and the clerk of the Supreme Court, the Department of Law and the law
library, in the New State Capitol, provided the General Assembly and the
Legislative Research Commission shall have complete control and exclusive
use of the third and fourth floors of the New State Capitol and shall have
exclusive use of the space in the New State Capitol Annex allocated to them
under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. If there be any additional
space in the Capitol, it shall be assigned to agencies whose activities are most
closely related to the agencies directed to be located permanently in the
Capitol;
(5) To acquire, by condemnation in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of
Kentucky, any real estate necessary for use by the state or by any state agency,
when the cabinet is unable to agree with the owner thereof on a price for such real
estate;
(6) To lease any real property, or any interest in such real property, owned by the state
or any agency thereof, in accordance with KRS 45A.045;
(7) To provide for and adopt plans and specifications as may be necessary, to provide
adequate public notice for and receive bids for any expenditures proposed to be
made, to award contracts for the purpose authorized, to supervise construction and
make changes and revisions in plans and specifications or in construction as may
become necessary, and generally to do any and all other things as may become
Page 12 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
necessary or expedient in order to effectively fulfill and carry out the purposes of
this chapter, including the right to employ clerks, engineers, statisticians, architects,
or other persons required to be employed in order to fulfill the functions of the
Commonwealth relating to state property and buildings provided in KRS 56.450 to
56.550; and
(8) To adopt rules and promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary to
govern the acquisition, control, and disposition of the real property to which this
section is applicable.
Section 3. KRS 27A.210 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following books and records shall be maintained by the State Law Library:
(a) All copies of Volumes 1 to 77 of the Kentucky Reports;
(b) Twenty-five (25) copies each of Volumes 78 to 314 of the Kentucky Reports;
(c) Two (2) sets of all future publications of the journals and nine (9) sets of the
Acts of the General Assembly; and
(d) Two (2) sets of the official Kentucky statute publications.
(2) The state law librarian shall arrange with the proper official of each state of the
United States and of the United States and its territories for the exchanges of the
statutes and the acts of the legislatures of each state and of Congress. When an
exchange is agreed upon, the state law librarian shall send to the officer one (1)
copy of the Acts of the General Assembly and one (1) set of statutes as soon as they
are ready for distribution.
(3) Copies of acts, statutes, and other materials required to be kept by the state law
librarian and to be made available for exchange shall be furnished to the state law
librarian, without charge, by the agency or official responsible for the distribution
of same.
(4) The state law librarian may arrange for the distribution or disposal of materials held
by the State Law Library upon concurrence of the administrative assistant to the
Page 13 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
Chief Justice responsible for law library operations.
(5) The state law librarian may acquire, by purchase, exchange, donation, or otherwise,
books and other materials the librarian deems suitable for the holdings of the State
Law Library.
(6) The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to
the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, sell any surplus books in
the State Law Library that have a market value, collect the funds received therefor,
and deposit them in the ["]state law library surplus books fund,["] which is hereby
created in the State Treasury. The ["]state law library surplus books fund["] shall
not lapse. The state law librarian may reinvest the funds in other books and
materials that the librarian deems suitable for the holdings of the State Law Library.
The provisions of KRS 45A.045(6)[(5)] concerning the powers and duties of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not apply to sales made by the state law
librarian under this section.
(7) The state law librarian may, with the concurrence of the administrative assistant to
the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, offer and provide technical
and other assistance to county law libraries and to other publicly funded law
libraries.
(8) The state law librarian may, upon the request of a county law library or other
publicly funded law library and with the concurrence of the administrative assistant
to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, purchase books, supplies,
or other materials for the library. The funds used for these purposes shall be those
of the county law library or other publicly funded law library.
(9) The state law librarian shall issue, with the concurrence of the administrative
assistant to the Chief Justice responsible for law library operations, regulations for
the operation, management, and lending policy of the State Law Library.
Section 4. KRS 45A.050 is amended to read as follows:
Page 14 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(1) Except as provided in KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835 and KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177,
and 180, all rights, powers, duties, and authority relating to the procurement of
supplies, services, and construction, and the management, control, warehousing,
sale, and disposal of supplies, services, and construction now vested in or exercised
by any state agency under the several statutes relating thereto, are hereby
transferred to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as provided
in this code, subject to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Unless otherwise ordered by the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, the acquisition of the following shall not be required through the Finance
and Administration Cabinet:
(a) Works of art for museum and public display;
(b) Published books, maps, periodicals, and technical pamphlets; and
(c) Services of visiting speakers, professors, and performing artists.
(3) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall include in all state agency price
contracts for the purchase of materials or supplies a provision that, as approved by
the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, any political subdivision,
including cities of all classes, counties, school districts, or special districts, may
participate in these contracts to the same extent as the Commonwealth. Any
political subdivision may purchase materials and supplies in accordance with a
contract for supplies and materials entered into by the Finance and Administration
Cabinet for the Commonwealth, including those contracts negotiated by the cabinet
with vendors who maintain a General Services Administration price agreement as
provided in KRS 45A.045(9)[(8)]. Political subdivisions of the Commonwealth
must comply with other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes which require
purchase by competitive bidding, before participating in the contract, unless the
state contract has been let by competitive bidding, or the contract was negotiated as
provided in KRS 45A.045(9)[(8)].
Page 15 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(4) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall inform the Department for Local
Government, which shall then inform the appropriate purchasing agent of each
political subdivision interested in participating under this section, of all state agency
contracts in effect between the Commonwealth and vendors.
(5) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate
administrative regulations necessary for the implementation of this section and
necessary to provide that the Commonwealth be reimbursed for any additional
expenses incurred by the Commonwealth in allowing political subdivisions to
participate in contracts with vendors.
(6) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall comply with all provisions relating
to the methods of purchasing in the Kentucky Revised Statutes. This section is not
intended to repeal or otherwise affect any provision of the Kentucky Revised
Statutes regarding purchasing methods of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(7) Notwithstanding any other statute to the contrary, all public agencies as defined in
KRS 45A.490 shall comply with the provisions for reciprocal preference for
resident bidders in KRS 45A.490 to 45A.494.
Section 5. KRS 45A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any public purchasing unit may either participate in, sponsor, conduct, or
administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the acquisition of any supplies,
services, or construction with any other public purchasing unit or foreign
purchasing activity, in accordance with an agreement entered into between the
participants. This cooperative purchasing may include[,] but is not limited to[,] joint
contracts between public purchasing units and access by local public purchasing
units to open-ended state public purchasing unit contracts.
(2) Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from selling to, acquiring
from, or using any property belonging to another public purchasing unit or foreign
purchasing activity independent of the requirements of KRS 45A.070 to 45A.180.
Page 16 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(3) Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict any public purchasing unit from entering
into an agreement, independent of the requirements of KRS 45A.045(6)[(5)] and
KRS 45A.070 to 45A.165, with any other public purchasing unit or foreign
purchasing activity for the cooperative use of supplies or services.
(4) Any public purchasing unit may enter into an agreement for the joint or common
use of warehousing facilities or the lease or common use of capital equipment or
facilities with any other public purchasing unit or a foreign purchasing activity
subject to the terms as may be agreed upon between the parties.
(5) Nothing in this code shall limit or restrict the ability of local school districts to
acquire supplies outside of the public purchasing agreements when the supplies and
equipment meeting the same specifications as the contract items are available at a
lower price elsewhere and the purchase does not exceed two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500).
(6) Nothing in this code shall limit any public purchasing unit from receiving notice of
or accepting a price reduction on supplies or equipment when the supplies or
equipment are being offered by the vendor with whom a price agreement has been
made; the supplies or equipment are being offered in accordance with all terms and
conditions that are specified in the price agreement, except those relating to price;
and the price reduction is offered to all of the participants in the price agreement.
Public purchasing units may accept special price reductions under this subsection
even if the reduced price requires the purchase of a specified quantity of units
different from the quantity stated in the original price agreement. Price reductions
under this subsection shall not be considered to permanently alter the price of the
supplies or equipment under the price agreement with the Commonwealth, except
where the price reductions are to be made permanent under the express terms of the
price agreement and where the purchasing agency which solicited the price
agreement determines that the enforcement of those terms serves the best interest of
Page 17 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
the Commonwealth.
(7) The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not exclude the Department of Fish
and Wildlife Resources from, or interfere with the department's participation in, any
contracts available to multiple state agencies for the procurement of goods or
services, including but not limited to interfering with the department's electronic
access to the statewide accounting system in any way.
Section 6. KRS 45A.810 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) One (1) or more architectural services selection committees and one (1) or
more engineering or engineering-related services selection committees shall
be created in the Finance and Administration Cabinet.
(b) One (1) or more engineering and engineering-related services selection
committees shall be created in the Transportation Cabinet.
(c) One (1) or more engineering and engineering-related services selection
committees shall be created in the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources.
(2) Except when an emergency condition exists as defined by KRS 45A.095(1)(a),
when architectural, engineering, or engineering-related services are procured under
KRS 45A.837 and 45A.838, or when the project is constructed under KRS
45A.045(12)[(11)](a) or (b):
(a) An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that cabinet's
procuring architectural services for its own needs and the needs of other
agencies, and upon request from the commissioner of the Department of Fish
and Wildlife Resources, shall assist and participate in that department's
procuring of architectural services;
(b) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created
in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall participate in every instance
Page 18 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
of that cabinet's procuring engineering or engineering-related services;
(c) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created
in the Transportation Cabinet shall participate in every instance of that
cabinet's procuring engineering or engineering-related services; and
(d) An engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created
in the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall participate in every
instance of that department's procuring of engineering or engineering-related
services.
(3) An architectural services selection committee created in the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to perform its own procurement and assist other state
agencies with procuring architectural services shall consist of six (6) or more
members selected in the manner specified within each paragraph:
(a) Two (2) architects. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall appoint a pool of at least six (6) architects who are employees of the
cabinet. At least three (3) of the architects shall be merit employees of the
cabinet. The secretary, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of
Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select architects from the pool.
The first employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the
first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected
shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a
nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit
employee is selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection
committee;
(b) One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities
Management, appointed by the commissioner of the Department for Facilities
Management, to serve as a nonvoting technical adviser for a given project
selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-by-project basis and
Page 19 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
shall have the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the
professional requirements of the project;
(c) Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that
agency to serve for the duration of the selection committee's participation in
the project for which they were appointed by the user agency;
(d) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Architects shall nominate nine (9)
individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to
serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
or designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the
committee;
(e) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as
nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then
that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any
committee proceeding; and
(f) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the
commissioner of the Department of Facilities Management shall submit a
statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with
the selection process for each architectural firm appointed to provide
architectural services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process
for each project shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to
audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(4) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the
Finance and Administration Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members
selected in the manner specified in each paragraph:
Page 20 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(a) Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall appoint a pool of at least six (6) engineers who are employees of the
cabinet. At least three (3) of the engineers shall be merit employees of the
cabinet. The secretary, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of
Public Accounts, or designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool.
The first employee selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the
first employee selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected
shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a
nonmerit employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit
employee is selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection
committee;
(b) Two (2) merit employees of the user agency appointed by the head of that
agency to serve for the duration of the selection committee's participation in
the project for which they were appointed by the user agency;
(c) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the
Kentucky Consulting Engineers Council shall together nominate nine (9)
individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to
serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, or designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
or designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the
committee;
(d) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as
nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then
that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any
committee proceeding;
Page 21 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
(e) One (1) or more additional employees of the Department for Facilities
Management to serve as nonvoting technical adviser for a specific project
selection. Advisory members shall serve on a project-by-project basis and
shall have the requisite knowledge, training, or experience pertaining to the
professional requirements of the project; and
(f) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the
commissioner of the Department of Facilities Management shall submit a
statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with
the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or
engineering-related services. In addition, a complete record of the selection
process for each project shall be maintained by the department and shall be
subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(5) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created in the
Transportation Cabinet shall consist of six (6) or more members selected in the
manner specified in each paragraph:
(a) Two (2) engineers. The secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall appoint a
pool of six (6) engineers who are employees of the cabinet. At least three (3)
of the engineers shall be merit employees of the cabinet. The secretary, or
designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or
designee, shall randomly select engineers from the pool. The first employee
selected shall be placed on the selection committee. If the first employee
selected is a merit employee, the second employee selected shall be placed on
the selection committee. If the first employee selected is a nonmerit
employee, the selection process shall continue until a merit employee is
selected. That merit employee shall be placed on the selection committee;
(b) Two (2) engineers who are merit employees of the user division appointed by
the head of that division to serve for the duration of the selection committee's
Page 22 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
participation in the project for which they were appointed by the user agency.
However, if two (2) user divisions have approximately equal responsibilities
or separate responsibilities for the project, each user division head shall
appoint one (1) member to the selection committee;
(c) An individual. The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the
Kentucky Consulting Engineers Council shall together nominate nine (9)
individuals, and the Governor shall appoint three (3) of these individuals to
serve in the pool from which the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet, or
designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or
designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;
(d) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as
nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then
that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any
committee proceeding; and
(e) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the
commissioner of the Department of Highways shall submit a statement to the
Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance with the selection
process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or engineering-related
services. In addition, a complete record of the selection process for each
project shall be maintained by the department and shall be subject to audit by
the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(6) The engineering and engineering-related services selection committee created
within the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall consist of six (6) or
more members selected as follows:
(a) The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall
Page 23 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
appoint five (5) members:
1. One (1) department employee in or designated to the job classification
of Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources Project Manager;
2. Two (2) Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources employees in the
Engineering and Geological series, at least one (1) of whom shall be a
merit employee;
3. One (1) merit employee of the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources designated by the division head for the project or by the
commissioner; and
4. One (1) employee of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources
who is an attorney;
(b) The Kentucky Society of Professional Engineers and the Kentucky Consulting
Engineers Council shall together nominate nine (9) individuals, and the
Governor shall select three (3) of these individuals to serve in a pool from
which the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, or
designee, under the supervision of the Auditor of Public Accounts, or
designee, shall randomly select one (1) individual to serve on the committee;
(c) One (1) or more merit employees of the Auditor of Public Accounts,
appointed by the Auditor, who may, at the discretion of the Auditor, serve as
nonvoting members of the committee. If one (1) employee is appointed, then
that employee may attend any committee proceedings. If more than one (1)
employee is appointed, then either of the employees may attend any
committee proceeding; and
(d) Upon completion of the selection process set forth in this subsection, the
commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall submit
a statement to the Auditor of Public Accounts attesting to full compliance
with the selection process for each firm appointed to provide engineering or
Page 24 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
engineering-related services. A complete record of the selection process for
each project shall be maintained by the Department of Fish and Wildlife
Resources and shall be subject to audit by the Auditor of Public Accounts.
(7) (a) All selection committee members shall have experience which qualifies them
to serve on the committee.
(b) The same appointment procedures set out in this section apply to any user
agency or user division listed in subsection (3), (4), (5), or (6) of this section
that does not operate under a merit system.
(c) Any individual appointed to serve in a pool from which selection committee
members are drawn shall serve in the pool for an initial one (1) year term and
may be reappointed. He or she shall serve until his or her successor is
appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case of a
vacancy in the pool, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial
appointee. If a selection committee member, drawn from a pool, leaves a
selection committee, his or her replacement shall be drawn from the pool in
the same manner as he or she. The replacement shall have the merit or
nonmerit status of his or her predecessor.
(d) Any individual appointed by the Auditor of Public Accounts to serve on
selection committees shall serve an initial one (1) year term and may be
reappointed to succeed himself or herself. He or she shall serve until his or her
successor is appointed and qualified. A successor or a replacement, in the case
of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the same manner as the initial appointee.
(e) The selection committee members appointed by the head of a user agency or
user division shall serve on a project-by-project basis. These members shall
participate only in committee action related to the project for which they were
appointed. A replacement, in the case of a vacancy, shall be appointed in the
same manner as the initial appointee.
Page 25 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
Section 7. KRS 56.774 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Energy Efficiency Program for State Government Buildings shall provide for
implementation of low cost/no cost energy conservation measures, engineering
analyses, energy efficiency measures, building improvements, and monitoring of
results for state-owned or state-leased buildings.
(2) Any engineering analysis conducted on a state-owned building shall assess the
energy efficiency of the building and make recommendations for improving the
efficient use of energy within the building. The analyses shall be performed by
qualified engineers, architects, or other persons trained in energy efficiency who
may be employees of the cabinet or employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 45A,
except that any engineers, architects or other persons trained in energy efficiency
and retained under a guaranteed energy savings performance contract, shall not be
subject to the provisions of KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, measures to improve the energy
efficiency of a state-owned building, which have an aggregate simple payback
period of five (5) years or less, shall be implemented as general fund appropriations
become available. No more than five percent (5%) of the cost of energy
conservation measures for a building may be utilized for monitoring the results.
(4) If general fund appropriations are available for energy conservation improvements,
the cabinet shall prioritize projects among the various state-owned buildings to
determine which projects shall be implemented to best utilize the available funding.
(5) If general fund appropriations are unavailable, energy conservation measures for a
state-owned building may be financed by other means. These other means include
but are not limited to guaranteed energy savings performance contracts as defined
under KRS 56.770 entered into pursuant to KRS 45A.085 and KRS
45A.045(11)[(10)]. Guaranteed energy savings performance contracts shall not be
subject to the provisions of KRS 45A.800 to 45A.835. These energy conservation
Page 26 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
measures shall not be limited to those that have an aggregate simple payback period
of five (5) years or less, but shall result in reasonable economic benefit to the
Commonwealth. Ownership of the energy conservation measures shall be
transferred to the Commonwealth upon completion of the guaranteed energy
savings performance contract or as otherwise agreed upon in the contract. Savings
from the implementation of the energy conservation measures under the guaranteed
energy savings performance contract shall be used to satisfy the obligations under
the guaranteed energy savings performance contract and to repay the cost of the
other means used to finance the energy conservation measures, and may be used to
repay expenses incurred by the cabinet to reimburse the cabinet for expenses related
to the guaranteed energy savings performance contract, including but not limited to
staff time for monitoring, overseeing, and managing the project. Notwithstanding
KRS 45.229, remaining savings shall remain in the state agency account and shall
not lapse. All savings projected under a guaranteed energy savings performance
contract shall be guaranteed to the Commonwealth.
(6) The savings in reduced expenditures that are specified as payment sources shall be
documented in the guaranteed energy savings performance contract. Savings shall
be determined by using one (1) of the measurement and verification methodologies
listed in the United States Department of Energy's "International Performance
Measurement and Verification Protocol." If specific data limitations or documented
unique characteristics of the project prevent use of the "International Performance
Measurement and Verification Protocol," an alternative method that is compatible
shall be adopted upon documentation and approval of the secretary of the cabinet.
Section 8. KRS 56.782 is amended to read as follows:
The cabinet shall report on or before October 15, 2008, and on or before every October
15 thereafter to the Legislative Research Commission on progress made to maximize the
use of energy-efficiency measures in state government. The Legislative Research
Page 27 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 467/GA
Commission shall transmit the report to the appropriate interim joint committees and to
the General Assembly when it convenes. The report shall include but not be limited to:
(1) A summary of initiatives undertaken by the cabinet during the reporting period to
promote adoption of low cost/no cost energy-efficiency measures, including
employee training efforts;
(2) A summary of energy-efficiency measures installed and energy improvements
made during the reporting period;
(3) Energy consumption and expenditure data for facilities owned or leased by state
government and any documented savings made as a result of energy-efficiency
measures and improvements;
(4) Status report on the number of buildings newly constructed, renovated, or leased in
accordance with the high-performance building standards required under KRS
56.777 and the amount of savings realized based upon a life-cycle cost analysis;
(5) Any efforts made during the reporting period to promote acquisition of energy-
efficient products pursuant to KRS 45A.045(13)[(12)] and the amount of savings
expected to be realized in the first year of operation from the purchase of ENERGY
STAR-qualified products pursuant to KRS 56.775;
(6) Any recommendations for future funding of energy improvements or other
measures needed to assure energy efficiency in state government; and
(7) Any improvements in energy efficiency planned or realized through the use of the
LEED rating system, the Green Globes rating system, ENERGY STAR-qualified
products, and guaranteed energy savings performance contracts.
Page 28 of 28
HB046710.100 - 40 - XXXX 2/25/2026 2:41 PM GA